Maryland, session 2026, HB1112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Chapter 696 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1112*

HOUSE BILL 1112
(b) There is a Maryland Health Insurance Coverage Protection Commission.
(g) (3) THE COMMISSION SHALL STUDY AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS
FOR INDIVIDUAL AND GROUP HEALTH INSURANCE MARKET STABILITY, INCLUDING
BY:
(I) HAVING AN ACTUARIAL ANALYSIS CONDUCTED THAT
COMPARES MEDICAID AND COMMERCIAL RATES TO ESTIMATE REALISTIC PREMIUM
SAVINGS IF A PUBLIC OPTION WERE TO BE CONSIDERED CONSIDERING WHETHER TO
ADOPT A DIRECT PAYMENT SYSTEM OR FEE–FOR–SERVICE MODEL FOR ALL
SERVICES COVERED BY THE MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
(II) EXPLORING REGULATORY EXEMPTIONS TO ALLOW
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS TO SELL IN THE INDIVIDUAL MARKET WITHOUT
MEETING FULL INSURER CAPITAL REQUIREMENTS;
(III) EXPLORING MERGING THE INDIVIDUAL AND SMALL GROUP
MARKETS TO STABILIZE RISK AND EXPAND THE BASE, INCLUDING WHETHER THIS
COULD BE DONE WITH EXISTING RESOURCES AND WHETHER LEGISLATION WOULD
BE NEEDED;
(IV) EXPLORING POOLING PURCHASING POWER ACROSS
STATES, INCLUDING WHETHER THIS COULD BE ALLOWED BY INTERSTATE COMPACT
AND PROVIDE A BASIS FOR COLLABORATION OF INTERESTED STATES;
(V) CONSIDERING WAYS TO CONTROL PRESCRIPTION DRUG
COSTS, INCLUDING BY ESTABLISHING A STATE PHARMACY BENEFIT
ADMINISTRATOR OR LEVERAGING STATE PURCHASING POWER;
(VI) IDENTIFYING WAYS TO SUSTAIN FEDERALLY QUALIFIED
HEALTH CENTERS, INCLUDING BY CONSIDERING A STATE SAFETY–NET GRANT;
(VII) CONSIDERING WHETHER TO ESTABLISH A MULTIYEAR
REINSURANCE STABILITY FUND;
(VIII) CONSIDERING WHETHER TO REINSTATE THE MARYLAND
HEALTH INSURANCE PLAN; AND
(IX) CONSIDERING THE DECEMBER 2026 RECOMMENDATIONS
OF THE COMMISSION TO STUDY HEALTH INSURANCE POOLING AND WHETHER THE
POOLING OF STATE, COUNTY, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT PURCHASERS TO COMBINE
BUYING POWER WILL RESULT IN BETTER RATES AND QUALITY ALIGNMENT WITHIN
THE STATE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1112 3
(X) IDENTIFYING WAYS TO SUSTAIN AND INCREASE PREMIUM
ASSISTANCE IN THE INDIVIDUAL MARKET.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective until the taking effect of the termination provision
specified in Section 2 of Chapter 696 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025. If that
termination provision takes effect, this Act shall be abrogated and of no further force and
effect. This Act may not be interpreted to have any effect on that termination provision.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.